hr-HR: Kompatibilnost CO2 cilindra: Cilindar od 130 l; Cilindar od 14 oz; Cilindar od 130 l; Cilindar od 33 oz; Cilindar od 60 l; Cilindar za brzo spajanje; Navojna patrona; Ostalo
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับถัง CO2: รองรับถังขนาด 130 ลิตร; รองรับถังขนาด 14 ออนซ์; รองรับถังขนาด 30 ลิตร; รองรับถังขนาด 33 ออนซ์; รองรับถังขนาด 60 ลิตร; รองรับถังระบบเชื่อมต่อเร็ว; รองรับคาร์ทริดจ์แบบเกลียว; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Съвместимост с CO2 бутилки: 130-литров цилиндър; 14-унцов цилиндър; 30-литров цилиндър; 33-унцов цилиндър; 60-литров цилиндър; Цилиндър за бързо свързване; Патрон с резба; Друго
en: CO2 cylinder compatibility: 130 L cylinder; 14 oz cylinder; 30 L cylinder; 33 oz cylinder; 60 L cylinder; Quick connect cylinder; Threaded cartridge; Other
zh-CN: 二氧化碳气瓶兼容性: 130 升气瓶; 14 盎司气瓶; 30 升气瓶; 33 盎司气瓶; 60 升气瓶; 快接气瓶; 螺纹气瓶; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s fľašami s CO2: 130 l fľaša; 14 oz fľaša; 30 l fľaša; 33 oz valec; 60 l fľaša; Fľaša s rýchlym pripojením; Kartuša so závitom; Iné
es: Compatibilidad de cilindros de CO2: Cilindro de 130 L; Cilindro de 14 oz; Cilindro de 30 L; Cilindro de 33 oz; Cilindro de 60 L; Cilindro de conexión rápida; Cartucho roscado; Otros
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com cilindros de CO2: Cilindro de 130 L; Cilindro de 14 oz; Cilindro de 30 L; Cilindro de 33 oz; Cilindro de 60 L; Cilindro de ligação rápida; Cartucho de rosca; Outro
sl-SI: Združljivost jeklenk s CO2: 130-litrski valj; 14-unčni valj; 30-litrska jeklenka; 33-unčni valj; 60-litrska jeklenka; Hitri priključek cilindra; Navojni vložek; Druga
lt-LT: CO₂ baliono suderinamumas: 130 litrų cilindras; 14 uncijų cilindras; 30 litrų cilindras; 33 uncijų cilindras; 60 litrų cilindras; Greito prijungimo cilindras; Srieginė kasetė; Kita
ru: Совместимость с баллоном CO2: Цилиндр 130 литров; Цилиндр 14 унций; Цилиндр 30 литров; Цилиндр 33 унции; Цилиндр 60 литров; Быстроразъемный цилиндр; Картридж с резьбой; Другое
vi: Khả năng tương thích của bình khí CO2: Bình loại 130 lít; Bình loại 14 oz; Bình loại 30 lít; Bình loại 33 oz; Bình loại 60 lít; Bình kết nối nhanh; Bình khí dạng ren; Khác
nb: Kompatibilitet med CO2-flasker: 130 liters sylinder; 14 oz sylinder; 30 liters sylinder; 33 oz sylinder; 60 liters sylinder; Hurtigkoblingssylinder; trådpatron; Annet
ko: CO2 실린더 호환성: 130리터 실린더; 14온스 실린더; 30리터 실린더; 33온스 실린더; 60리터 실린더; 퀵 커넥트 실린더; 나사형 카트리지; 기타
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea buteliilor de CO2: Butelie 130 l; Butelie de 0,41 l; Butelie de 30 l; Butelie de 0,97 l; Butelie de 60 l; Butelie cu conectare rapidă; Cartuș filetat; Altele
it: Compatibilità con bombole di CO2: Cilindro da 130 litri; cilindro da 14 once; Cilindro da 30 litri; Cilindro da 33 once; Cilindro da 60 litri; Cilindro ad attacco rapido; Cartuccia filettata; Altro
el: Συμβατότητα φιάλης CO2: Φιάλη 130 λίτρων; Φιάλη 14 oz; Φιάλη 30 λίτρων; Φιάλη 33 oz; Φιάλη 60 λίτρων; Φιάλη γρήγορης σύνδεσης; Φυσίγγιο με σπείρωμα; Άλλο
da: CO2-cylinderkompatibilitet: 130 l cylinder; 14 oz cylinder; 30 l cylinder; 33 oz cylinder; 60 l cylinder; Lynkoblingscylinder; Patron med gevind; Andet
de: Kompatibilität der CO2-Zylinder: 130-Liter-Zylinder; 14-Unzen-Zylinder; 30-Liter-Zylinder; 33-Unzen-Zylinder; 60-Liter-Zylinder; Schnellkupplungszylinder; Gewindepatrone; Sonstiges
ja: CO2シリンダーの互換性: 130Lシリンダー; 14オンスシリンダー; 30Lシリンダー; 33オンスシリンダー; 60Lシリンダー; クイックコネクトシリンダー; スレッド付きカートリッジ; その他
pl: Kompatybilność z butlami CO2: Nabój 130 L; Nabój 14 oz; Nabój 30 L; Nabój 33 oz; Nabój 60 L; Nabój szybkozłączny; Nabój gwintowany; Pozostałe
hu: CO2 palack kompatibilitása: 130 literes palack; 14 unciás palack; 30 literes palack; 33 unciás palack; 60 literes palack; Gyorscsatlakozós palack; Menetes patron; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilita s láhvemi CO₂: Tlaková lahev 130 l; Tlaková lahev 14 oz; Tlaková lahev 30 l; Tlaková lahev 33 oz; Tlaková lahev 60 l; Tlaková lahev s rychlospojkou; Kartuše se závitem; Jiné
zh-TW: CO2 鋼瓶相容性: 130 公升鋼瓶; 14 盎司鋼瓶; 30 公升鋼瓶; 33 盎司鋼瓶; 60 公升鋼瓶; 快速連接鋼瓶; 螺牙型燃料罐; 其他
fi: CO₂-sylinterien yhteensopivuus: 130 litran säiliö; 14 unssin säiliö; 30 litran säiliö; 33 unssin säiliö; 60 litran säiliö; Pikaliitossäiliö; Kierrepatruuna; Muu
sv: Kompatibilitet med CO2-flaskor: 130 liters cylinder; 14 oz cylinder; 30 liters cylinder; 33 oz cylinder; 60 liters cylinder; Snabbkopplingscylinder; Gängad patron; Övrigt
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com cilindros de CO2: Cilindro de 130 L; Cilindro de 14 onças; Cilindro de 30 L; Cilindro de 33 onças; Cilindro de 60 L; Cilindro de conexão rápida; Cartucho de rosca; Outro
nl: Compatibiliteit van CO2-cilinders: 130 liter cilinder; 0,41 liter cilinder; 30 liter cilinder; 0,98 liter cilinder; 60 liter cilinder; Snelkoppelcilinder; Schroefdraadpatroon; Overig
fr: Compatibilité des cartouches de CO<sub>2</sub>: Cylindre de 130 l; Cylindre de 14 oz; Cylindre de 30 l; Cylindre de 33 oz; Cylindre de 60 l; Cylindre à connexion rapide; Cartouche filetée; Autre
tr: CO2 tüpü uyumluluğu: 130 L silindir; 14 oz silindir; 30 L silindir; 33 oz silindir; 60 L silindir; Hızlı bağlantılı silindir; Dişli kartuş; Diğer